Washington statutes.
RCW 10.29.100

Vacancy in office.

Whenever a statewide special inquiry judge or special prosecutor appointed under this chapter dies or in any other way is rendered incapable of continuing the duties of his or her office, a successor shall be appointed to serve for the remainder of the judge's or prosecutor's term in the manner provided for by *RCW 10.29.030 and 10.29.080 for the appointment of statewide special inquiry judges and special prosecutors.

[ 1980 c 146 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 10.29.030 and 10.29.080 were repealed by 2009 c 560 s 24.